Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0501.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 16335. (1) Fees for an individual licensed or seeking licensure to engage in the practice of physical therapy or practice as a physical therapist assistant under part 178 are as follows: (a) Application processing fee $ 20.00 (b) Examination fees: Jurisprudence examination only 25.00 (c) License fee, per year 90.00 (d) Limited license, per year 25.00 (2) The fee for an individual seeking to hold a compact privilege under the physical therapy licensure compact enacted in section 16187a is $90.00 per year. Sec. 17801. (1) As used in this part: (a) âPhysical therapistâ means an individual who is licensed under this article or authorized under section 17820a to engage in the practice of physical therapy. (b) âPhysical therapist assistantâ means an individual with a health profession subfield license under this part, or who is authorized under section 17820b to engage in practice as a physical therapist assistant, who assists a physical therapist in physical therapy intervention. (c) âPhysical therapy licensure compactâ means the physical therapy licensure compact enacted in section 16187a. (d) âPractice as physical therapist assistantâ means the practice of physical therapy performed under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed under this part. (e) âPractice of physical therapyâ means the evaluation of, education of, consultation with, or treatment of an individual by the employment of effective properties of physical measures and the use of therapeutic exercises and rehabilitative procedures, with or without assistive devices, for the purpose of preventing, correcting, or alleviating a physical or mental disability. Physical therapy includes treatment planning, performance of tests and measurements, interpretation of referrals, initiation of referrals, instruction, consultative services, and supervision of personnel. Physical measures include massage, mobilization, heat, cold, air, light, water, electricity, and sound. Practice of physical therapy does not include the identification of underlying medical problems or etiologies, establishment of medical diagnoses, or the prescribing of treatment. (2) In addition to the definitions in this part, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code and part 161 contains definitions applicable to this part. Sec. 17820a. (1) An individual who holds a compact privilege to practice as a physical therapist under the physical therapy licensure compact is authorized to engage in the practice of physical therapy under this article. (2) For purposes of this article, including the obligations of an individual who is licensed as a physical therapist, an individual who holds a compact privilege to practice as a physical therapist under the physical therapy licensure compact is considered a physical therapist who is licensed under this part. Sec. 17820b. (1) An individual who holds a compact privilege to work as a physical therapist assistant under the physical therapy licensure compact is authorized to engage in practice as a physical therapist assistant under this article under the supervision of a physical therapist. (2) For purposes of this article, including the obligations of an individual who is licensed as a physical therapist assistant, an individual who holds a compact privilege to work as a physical therapist assistant under the physical therapy licensure compact is considered a physical therapist assistant who is licensed under this part. Sec. 17821. (1) The Michigan board of physical therapy is created in the department and shall consist of the following 11 voting members who must meet the requirements of part 161: 6 physical therapists, 1 physical therapist assistant, and 4 public members. (2) The terms of office of the individual members of the board created under this section, except those appointed to fill vacancies, expire 4 years after appointment on December 31 of the year in which the term expires. (3) The board shall select the director to act as this stateâs delegate for purposes of the physical therapy licensure compact. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 18 months after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4101 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor